Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2194
Encumbrance proceedings; not to delay distribution of other shares.

The proceedings in relation to the encumbrances shall not delay the distribution of the proceeds of other shares in respect to which no difficulties exist.

R.S.1867, Code § 827, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8310;

C.S.1922, § 9262;

C.S.1929, § 20-2194;

R.S.1943, § 25-2194.

In default of owner, person holding an encumbrance may appear and act as his representative. Hartman v. Drake, 166 Neb. 87, 87 N.W.2d 895 (1958).